Alaska, session 34, HB116.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 * Section 1. AS 21.03.021 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 06 (l) This title does not apply to two or more persons engaged in commercial 07 fishing activities who enter into a cooperative agreement with each other to pool 08 contributions for the purpose of paying claims or losses arising from 09 (1) a liability claim against a commercial fishing business operated by 10 a member of the pool; or 11 (2) the loss of or damage to a vessel or machine used in a commercial 12 fishing business that is owned or leased by a member of the pool. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.